California, session 20252026, AB1511.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting Section 6 of this bill to ensure that Senate Bill No. 948 (Chapter 125 of the Statutes of 2024) is interpreted consistent with the Fair Political Practices Commission’s advice in its Brown Advice Letter No. A-09-276 issued on January 25, 2010.SEC. 2. Section 81001 of the Government Code is amended to read:81001. The people find and declare as follows:(a) State and local government should serve the needs and respond to the wishes of all citizens equally, without regard to their wealth;(b) Public officials, whether elected or appointed, should perform their duties in an impartial manner, free from bias caused by their own financial interests or the financial interests of persons who have supported them;(c) Costs of conducting election campaigns have increased greatly in recent years, and candidates have been forced to finance their campaigns by seeking large contributions from lobbyists and organizations who thereby gain disproportionate influence over governmental decisions;(d) The influence of large campaign contributors is increased because existing laws for disclosure of campaign receipts and expenditures have proved to be inadequate;(e) Lobbyists often make their contributions to incumbents who cannot be effectively challenged because of election laws and abusive practices which give the incumbent an unfair advantage;(f) The wealthy individuals and organizations which make large campaign contributions frequently extend their influence by employing lobbyists and spending large amounts to influence legislative and administrative actions;(g) The influence of large campaign contributors in ballot measure elections is increased because the state voter information guide mailed to the voters by the state is difficult to read and almost impossible for a layperson to understand; and(h) Previous laws regulating political practices have suffered from inadequate enforcement by state and local authorities.SEC. 3. Section 81002 of the Government Code is amended to read:81002. The people enact this title to accomplish the following purposes:(a) Receipts and expenditures in election campaigns should be fully and truthfully disclosed in order that the voters may be fully informed and improper practices may be inhibited.(b) The activities of lobbyists should be regulated and their finances disclosed in order that improper influences will not be directed at public officials.(c) Assets and income of public officials which may be materially affected by their official actions should be disclosed and in appropriate circumstances the officials should be disqualified from acting in order that conflicts of interest may be avoided.(d) The state voter information guide should be converted into a useful document so that voters will not be entirely dependent on paid advertising for information regarding state measures.(e) Laws and practices unfairly favoring incumbents should be abolished in order that elections may be conducted more fairly.(f) Adequate enforcement mechanisms should be provided to public officials and private citizens in order that this title will be vigorously enforced.SEC. 4. Section 84101 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 1 of Chapter 180 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:84101. (a) A committee that is a committee by virtue of subdivision (a) of Section 82013 shall file a statement of organization. The committee shall file the original of the statement of organization with the Secretary of State and shall also file a copy of the statement of organization with the local filing officer, if any, with whom the committee is required to file an original campaign statement pursuant to Section 84215. The original and copy of the statement of organization shall be filed within 10 days after the committee has qualified as a committee. The Secretary of State shall assign a number to each committee that files a statement of organization and shall notify the committee of the number. The Secretary of State shall send a copy of statements filed pursuant to this section, with the information specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) redacted, to the county elections official of each county that the Secretary of State deems appropriate. A county elections official who receives a copy of a statement of organization from the Secretary of State pursuant to this section shall send a copy of the statement to the clerk of each city in the county that the county elections official deems appropriate.(b) In addition to filing the statement of organization as required by subdivision (a), if a committee qualifies as a committee under subdivision (a) of Section 82013 before the date of an election in connection with which the committee is required to file preelection statements, but after the closing date of the last campaign statement required to be filed before the election pursuant to Section 84200.8 or 84200.9, the committee shall file, by facsimile transmission, online transmission, guaranteed overnight delivery, or personal delivery within 24 hours of qualifying as a committee, the information required to be reported in the statement of organization. The information required by this subdivision shall be filed with the filing officer with whom the committee is required to file an original campaign statement pursuant to Section 84215.(c) If an independent expenditure committee qualifies as a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 during the time period described in Section 82036.5 and makes independent expenditures of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more to support or oppose a candidate or candidates for office, the committee shall file, by facsimile transmission, online transmission, guaranteed overnight delivery, or personal delivery within 24 hours of qualifying as a committee, the information required to be reported in the statement of organization. The information required by this section shall be filed with the filing officer with whom the committee is required to file an original campaign statement pursuant to Section 84215, and shall be filed at all locations required for the candidate or candidates supported or opposed by the independent expenditures. The filings required by this section are in addition to filings that may be required by Section 84204.(d) For purposes of this section, in calculating whether two thousand dollars ($2,000) in contributions has been received, payments for a filing fee or for a statement of qualifications to appear in a state or county voter information guide shall not be included if these payments have been made from the candidate’s personal funds.(e) (1) A committee may redact, or otherwise omit, a bank account number included on the copy of the statement of organization filed with the local filing officer pursuant to subdivision (a). A local filing officer shall not require a committee to disclose a bank account number on the copy of the statement of organization filed with the local filing officer as a condition of accepting that filing.(2) Notwithstanding Section 81008 or the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), the Secretary of State shall redact the bank account number on a statement of organization filed with the Secretary of State before making the statement available to the public in any form.SEC. 5. Section 84217 of the Government Code is amended to read:84217. When the Secretary of State receives any campaign statement filed pursuant to the federal Election Campaign Act, (52 U.S.C.A. Section 30101 et seq.) the Secretary of State shall send a copy of the statement to the following officers:(a) Statements of candidates for President, Vice President, or United States Senator and committees supporting such candidates—one copy with the Registrar-Recorder of Los Angeles County and one copy with the Registrar of Voters of the City and County of San Francisco;(b) Statements of candidates for United States Representative in Congress and committees supporting such candidates—one copy with the clerk of the county which contains the largest percentage of the registered voters in the election district which the candidate or any of the candidates seek nomination or election and one copy with the clerk of the county within which the candidate resides or in which the committee is domiciled, provided that if the committee is not domiciled in California the statement shall be sent to the Registrar-Recorder of Los Angeles County. No more than one copy of each statement need be filed with the clerk of any county.SEC. 6. Section 85318 of the Government Code is amended to read:85318. (a) (1) A candidate for elective state, county, or city office may raise contributions for a general election before the primary election, and for a special general election before a special primary election, for the same elective state, county, or city office if the candidate sets aside these contributions and uses these contributions for the general election or special general election. If the candidate for elective state, county, or city office is defeated in the primary election or special primary election, or otherwise withdraws from the general election or special general election, the general election or special general election funds shall be refunded to the contributors on a pro rata basis less any expenses associated with the raising and administration of general election or special general election contributions.(2) A candidate whose name has not been listed on the ballot at a primary election or special primary election, and who has not qualified to have write-in votes cast on their behalf counted by elections officials for nomination or election to an elective office at a primary election or special primary election is not “defeated in the primary election or special primary election” and does not “otherwise withdraw from the general election or special general election” for the purposes of paragraph (1), and shall not be required to refund contributions pursuant to that paragraph. A candidate whose name has not been listed on the ballot at a primary election or special primary election, and who has not qualified to have write-in votes cast on their behalf counted by elections officials for nomination or election to an elective office at a primary election or special primary election, may transfer funds to a committee established for the same or a different office subject to the attribution rules provided by subdivision (a) of Section 85306.(3) Notwithstanding Section 85201, candidates for elective state, county, or city office may establish separate campaign contribution accounts for the primary and general elections or special primary and special general elections.(b) This section does not apply in a jurisdiction in which the county or city imposes a limit on contributions pursuant to Section 85702.5.SEC. 7. Section 85600 of the Government Code is amended to read:85600. The Secretary of State shall designate in the state voter information guide those candidates for statewide elective office, as defined in Section 82053, who have voluntarily agreed to the expenditure limitations set forth in Section 85400. Local elections officers shall designate in the county voter information guide those candidates for State Senate and Assembly who have voluntarily agreed to the expenditure limitations set forth in Section 85400.SEC. 8. Section 85601 of the Government Code is amended to read:85601. (a) A candidate for statewide elective office, as defined in Section 82053, who accepts the voluntary expenditure limits set forth in Section 85400 may purchase the space to place a statement in the state voter information guide that does not exceed 250 words. The statement may not make any reference to any opponent of the candidate. The statement shall be submitted in accordance with timeframes and procedures set forth by the Secretary of State for the preparation of the state voter information guide.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 88001 of this code or subdivision (e) of Section 9084 of the Elections Code, the Secretary of State may not include in the state voter information guide a statement from a candidate who has not voluntarily agreed to the expenditure limitations set forth in Section 85400.(c) A candidate for State Senate or Assembly who accepts the voluntary expenditure limits set forth in Section 85400 may purchase the space to place a statement in the county voter information guide that does not exceed 250 words. The statement may not make any reference to any opponent of the candidate. The statement shall be submitted in accordance with the timeframes and procedures set forth in the Elections Code for the preparation of the county voter information guide.SEC. 9. Section 88000 of the Government Code is amended to read:88000. There shall be a state voter information guide which shall be prepared by the Secretary of State.SEC. 10. Section 88001 of the Government Code is amended to read:88001. The state voter information guide shall contain all of the following:(a) A complete copy of each state measure.(b) A copy of the specific constitutional or statutory provision, if any, that would be repealed or revised by each state measure.(c) A copy of the arguments and rebuttals for and against each state measure.(d) A copy of the analysis of each state measure.(e) Tables of contents, indexes, art work, graphics, and other materials that the Secretary of State determines will make the state voter information guide easier to understand or more useful for the average voter.(f) A notice, conspicuously printed on the cover of the state voter information guide indicating that additional copies of the guide will be mailed by the county elections official upon request.(g) A written explanation of the judicial retention procedure as required by Section 9083 of the Elections Code.(h) The Voter Bill of Rights pursuant to Section 2300 of the Elections Code.(i) If the ballot contains an election for the office of United States Senator, information on candidates for United States Senator. A candidate for United States Senator may purchase the space to place a statement in the state voter information guide that does not exceed 250 words. The statement may not make any reference to any opponent of the candidate. The statement shall be submitted in accordance with timeframes and procedures set forth by the Secretary of State for the preparation of the state voter information guide.(j) If the ballot contains a question as to the confirmation or retention of a justice of the Supreme Court, information on justices of the Supreme Court who are subject to confirmation or retention.(k) If the ballot contains an election for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States, a notice that refers voters to the Secretary of State’s internet website for information about candidates for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States.(l) A written explanation of the appropriate election procedures for party-nominated, voter-nominated, and nonpartisan offices as required by Section 9083.5 of the Elections Code.(m) A written explanation of the top 10 contributor lists required by Section 84223, including a description of the internet websites where those lists are available to the public.SEC. 11. Section 88002 of the Government Code is amended to read:88002. The state voter information guide shall contain as to each state measure to be voted upon, the following in the order set forth in this section:(a) (1) Upon the top portion of the first page and not exceeding one-third of the page shall appear:(A) The identification of the measure by number and title.(B) The official summary prepared by the Attorney General.(i) For a statewide referendum measure, the official summary prepared by the Attorney General shall precede all of the following in the order set forth in this clause:(I) A blank horizontal line.(II) After the text “TOP FUNDERS OF PETITION TO OVERTURN THE LAW:” a listing of the three persons who made the most aggregated contributions and expenditures of $50,000 or more to qualify the referendum as of the last day petitions are filed with an elections official. A person who is required to be listed after the official summary pursuant to this clause is a “top funder.”(III) If a person that is a primarily formed ballot measure committee within the meaning of Section 82047.5 of the Government Code or a general purpose committee within the meaning of Section 82027.5 of the Government Code is one of the persons who made the most aggregated contributions and expenditures to qualify the referendum as of the last day petitions are filed with an elections official, the primarily formed committee or general purpose committee shall not be listed as a top funder pursuant to subclause (II), and, instead, the highest contributors to the primarily formed committee or general purpose committee within the prior 90 days shall be listed as top funders pursuant to subclause (II) if their contributions to the primarily formed committee or general purpose committee, combined with all other contributions and expenditures to qualify the referendum, qualify the person or persons as top funders.(ii) The name of a top funder may be shortened at the discretion of the Secretary of State by using acronyms, abbreviations, or by leaving out words in the entity’s name, as long as doing so would not confuse or mislead voters about the identity of a top funder.(iii) Each top funder shall be printed in a font size that is the same as a majority of the text on the page and separated by a semicolon.(iv) The Secretary of State shall determine the list of top funders no later than the date a referendum qualifies for the ballot.(C) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in both the State Senate and Assembly if the measure was passed by the Legislature.(2) The space in the title and summary that is used for an explanatory table prepared pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 9087 of the Elections Code and Section 88003 shall not be included when measuring the amount of space the information described in paragraph (1) has taken for purposes of determining compliance with the restriction prohibiting the information described in paragraph (1) from exceeding one-third of the page.(b) Beginning at the top of the right page shall appear the analysis prepared by the Legislative Analyst, provided that the analysis fits on a single page. If it does not fit on a single page, then the analysis shall begin on the lower portion of the first left page and shall continue on subsequent pages until it is completed.(c) Immediately below the analysis prepared by the Legislative Analyst shall appear a printed statement that refers voters to the Secretary of State’s internet website for a list of committees primarily formed to support or oppose a ballot measure, and information on how to access the committee’s top 10 contributors.(d) Arguments for and against the measure shall be placed on the next left and right pages, respectively, following the page on which the analysis of the Legislative Analyst ends. The rebuttals shall be placed immediately below the arguments.(e) If no argument against the measure has been submitted, the argument for the measure shall appear on the right page facing the analysis.(f) The complete text of each measure shall appear at the back of the state voter information guide. The text of the measure shall contain the provisions of the proposed measure and the existing provisions of law repealed or revised by the measure. The provisions of the proposed measure differing from the existing provisions of law affected shall be distinguished in print, so as to facilitate comparison.(g) The following statement shall be printed at the bottom of each page where arguments appear: “Arguments printed on this page are the opinions of the authors and have not been checked for accuracy by any official agency.”SEC. 12. Section 88002.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:88002.5. (a) The state voter information guide shall also contain a section, located near the front of the guide, that provides a concise summary of the general meaning and effect of “yes” and “no” votes on each state measure.(b) The summary statements required by this section shall be prepared by the Legislative Analyst. These statements are not intended to provide comprehensive information on each measure. The Legislative Analyst shall be solely responsible for determining the contents of these statements. The statements shall be available for public examination and amendment pursuant to Section 88006.SEC. 13. Section 88003 of the Government Code is amended to read:88003. The Legislative Analyst shall prepare an impartial analysis of the measure describing the measure and including a fiscal analysis of the measure showing the amount of any increase or decrease in revenue or cost to state or local government. Any estimate of increased cost to local governments shall be set out in boldface print in the state voter information guide. The analysis shall be written in clear and concise terms which will easily be understood by the average voter, and shall avoid the use of technical terms wherever possible. The analysis may contain background information, including the effect of the measure on existing law and the effect of enacted legislation which will become effective if the measure is adopted, and shall generally set forth in an impartial manner the information which the average voter needs to understand the measure adequately. The Legislative Analyst may contract with professional writers, educational specialists, or other persons for assistance in writing an analysis that fulfills the requirements of this section, including the requirement that the analysis be written so that it will be easily understood by the average voter. The Legislative Analyst may also request the assistance of any state department, agency, or official in preparing the Legislative Analyst’s analysis. Prior to submission of the analysis to the Secretary of State, the Legislative Analyst shall submit the analysis to a committee of five persons appointed by the Legislative Analyst for the purpose of reviewing the analysis to confirm its clarity and easy comprehension to the average voter. The committee shall be drawn from the public at large, and one member shall be a specialist in education, one shall be bilingual, and one shall be a professional writer. Members of the committee shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties. Within five days of the submission of the analysis to the committee, the committee shall make such recommendations to the Legislative Analyst as it deems appropriate to guarantee that the analysis can be easily understood by the average voter. The Legislative Analyst shall consider the committee’s recommendations, and the Legislative Analyst shall incorporate in the analysis those changes recommended by the committee that the Legislative Analyst deems to be appropriate. The Legislative Analyst is solely responsible for determining the content of the analysis required by this section. The title and summary of any measure which appears on the ballot shall be amended to contain a summary of the Legislative Analyst’s estimate of the net state and local government financial impact. For state bond measures that are submitted to the voters for their approval or rejection, the summary of the Legislative Analyst’s estimate of the net state and local government fiscal impact shall include an explanatory table of the information in the summary.SEC. 14. Section 88004 of the Government Code is amended to read:88004. Measures shall be printed in the state voter information guide, so far as possible, in the same order, manner, and form in which they are designated upon the ballot.SEC. 15. Section 88005 of the Government Code is amended to read:88005. The state voter information guide shall be printed according to the following specifications:(a) The guide shall be printed in clear readable type, no less than 10-point, except that the text of any measure may be set forth in 8-point type.(b) It shall be of a size and printed on a quality and weight of paper which in the judgment of the Secretary of State best serves the voters.(c) The guide shall contain a certificate of correctness by the Secretary of State.SEC. 16. Section 88006 of the Government Code is amended to read:88006. Not less than 20 days before submitting the copy for the state voter information guide to the State Printer, the Secretary of State shall make the copy available for public examination. Any elector may seek a writ of mandate requiring the copy to be amended or deleted from the state voter information guide. A peremptory writ of mandate shall issue only upon clear and convincing proof that the copy in question is false, misleading, or inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter or the Elections Code, and that issuance of the writ will not substantially interfere with the printing and distribution of the state voter information guide as required by law. Venue for a proceeding under this section shall be exclusively in Sacramento County. The Secretary of State shall be named as the respondent and the State Printer and the person or official who authored the copy in question shall be named as real parties in interest. If the proceeding is initiated by the Secretary of State, the State Printer shall be named as the respondent.SEC. 17. Section 88007 of the Government Code is amended to read:88007. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 81012, the Legislature may without restriction amend this chapter to add to the state voter information guide information regarding candidates or any other information.SEC. 18. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.